District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2853.19

Cease and desist orders.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 5(d), 53 DCR 1050

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.19.